Maine, session 132, LD2015.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §1055, sub-§9, ¶E, as amended by PL 1983, c. 859, Pt. A,
§§4 and 25, is further amended to read:
E. The amount received for tuition; and
Sec. 2. 20-A MRSA §1055, sub-§9, ¶E-1 is enacted to read:
E-1. The number and type of the school administrative unit's vacant teacher and
educational technician positions; and
Sec. 3. Department of Education; use of data. Activities undertaken by the
Department of Education using data reported to the commissioner of education by
superintendents of school administrative units pursuant to the Maine Revised Statutes, Title
20-A, section 1055, subsection 9, paragraph E-1, including, but not limited to, data
aggregation and data mapping, must be done within existing resources.
Page 1 - 132LR2623(03)